Illinois, session 104th, SB1924.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the First 5Responder Medal of Honor Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" means the Illinois Emergency Management 8Agency and Office of Homeland Security.9    "First responder" includes:10        (1) law enforcement officers as defined in Section 2 11    of the Line of Duty Compensation Act;12        (2) firemen as defined in Section 2 of the Line of Duty 13    Compensation Act; and14        (3) emergency medical service personnel as defined in 15    Emergency the Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. 16    Section 10. The First Responder Medal of Honor.17    (a) The Governor may award the First Responder Medal of 18Honor to a first responder who displays conspicuous gallantry 19and intrepidity at the risk of the first responder's life 20above and beyond the call of duty while engaged in an act of 21public service.22    (b) The Governor may award the First Responder Medal of   SB1924- 2 -LRB104 07376 RTM 17416 b1Honor only to a first responder deemed eligible by the 2Department under Section 15.3    (c) The Governor shall determine the time and place of the 4public ceremony where a first responder or the first 5responder's next of kin are presented the First Responder 6Medal of Honor. 7    Section 15. Eligibility.8    (a) The Department shall determine if a first responder is 9eligible for the First Responder Medal of Honor. Only first 10responders deemed eligible by the Department may be awarded 11the First Responder Medal of Honor.12    (b) The Department shall consider every recommendation for 13the First Responder Medal of Honor made under Section 20. 14    Section 20. Recommendations.15    (a) The first responder's employer may recommend a first 16responder who has been killed or seriously injured in the line 17of duty for the First Responder Medal of Honor.18    (b) A member of the General Assembly may recommend a first 19responder who resides, works, or dies in the line of duty in 20the member's district for the First Responder Medal of Honor. 21    Section 25. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 22to implement and administer this Act.